District of Columbia statutes.
26-1153.04

Final decision.

A decision of the Mayor under § 26-1153.03 shall be a final order for the purposes of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, and shall be enforceable in a court of competent jurisdiction. The Mayor shall publish the final decisions, subject to redaction or modification to preserve confidentiality. Any person aggrieved by a final decision of the Mayor pursuant to this subchapter may appeal the decision to Superior Court of the District of Columbia.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 304, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 304 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).